Illinois, session 104th, HB1735.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 529-21 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/29-21 new)7    Sec. 29-21. Non-citizen voting.8    (a) Except as otherwise provided by federal law, any 9person who is not a citizen of the United States and who 10knowingly registers to vote or knowingly votes in an election, 11including a municipal election, shall be guilty of a Class 3 12felony.13    (b) Except as otherwise provided by federal law, any 14person who knowingly registers a person to vote who is not a 15citizen of the United States shall be guilty of a Class 3 16felony. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.